Hawaii statutes.
§143-14 Female dogs. It shall be
unlawful for the owner of any female dog, licensed or unlicensed, to permit it
to run at large while the dog is in the copulating season. [L 1941, c 268, §12;
RL 1945, §7163; RL 1955, §156-14; HRS §143-14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next